Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.070

Payment of fine and costs in installments.

Hereafter whenever any judge of any superior court or a district or municipal judge shall sentence any person to pay any fines, penalties, assessments, fees, and costs, the judge may, in the judge's discretion, provide that such fines, penalties, assessments, fees, and costs may be paid in certain designated installments, or within certain designated period or periods. If the court finds that the defendant is indigent as defined in RCW 10.01.160(3), the court shall allow for payment in certain designated installments or within certain designated periods. If such fines, penalties, assessments, fees, and costs shall be paid by the defendant in accordance with such order no commitment or imprisonment of the defendant shall be made for failure to pay such fine or costs. PROVIDED, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to any sentence given for the violation of any of the liquor laws of this state.

[ 2022 c 260 s 21; 2018 c 269 s 11; 1987 c 3 s 4; 1923 c 15 s 1; RRS s 2280-1.]

NOTES:

Construction—Effective date—2022 c 260: See notes following RCW 3.66.120.

Construction—2018 c 269: See note following RCW 10.82.090.

Severability—1987 c 3: See note following RCW 3.70.010.

Applicability—1984 c 209: See RCW 9.92.900.

Collection and disposition of fines and costs: Chapter 10.82 RCW.

Payment of fine and costs in installments: RCW 10.01.170.